District of Columbia statutes.
42-408

Record of conveyance by infant or infant trustee as evidence.

The record or a copy thereof of any deed recorded shall be evidence thereof, in the same manner and shall have the same effect as if such deed had been originally executed, acknowledged, and recorded according to law.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1271, ch. 854, § 519
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 532, ch. 1329
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 47, 43 DCR 530

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-804.
1973 Ed., § 45-504.